Nebraska, session 109, LB745.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. Section 79-730, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
79-730 The Commissioner of Education may issue a diploma of high school
equivalency conveying all the significance and privilege of a regular high
school diploma to any person who is not a high school graduate if:
(1) The person is and has been a resident of Nebraska for at least thirty
days immediately preceding application or if his or her final period of high
school attendance during which credit was earned toward graduation was in a
Nebraska high school;
(2) On the basis of such person's achievements in approved tests and other
criteria deemed pertinent by the Commissioner of Education, there is reasonable
certainty that he or she has attained the educational development and abilities
of the typical high school graduate; and
(3) Such person has attained his or her eighteenth birthday and is unable
to secure a diploma from the high school he or she last attended or the class
in which he or she was enrolled at the time of his or her withdrawal from
school has been graduated for at least one year.
Sec. 2. Original section 79-730, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
repealed.
-1-